Utah statutes.
63M-2-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Commercialization revenues " means dividends, realized capital gains, license fees, royalty fees, and other revenues received by a university as a result of commercial applications developed from the project, less:

(a)  the portion of those revenues allocated to the inventor; and

(b)  expenditures incurred by the university to legally protect the intellectual property.

(2)  "Executive director" means the person appointed by the governing authority under Section 63M-2-301.

(3)  "Governing authority" means the Utah Science Technology and Research Governing Authority created in Section 63M-2-301.

(4)  "Project" means the Utah Science Technology and Research Project.

(5)  "Research buildings" means any of the buildings listed in Section 63M-2-201.

(6)  "Research universities" means the University of Utah and Utah State University.

(7)  "Technology outreach program" means the program required by Section 63M-2-202.

(8)  "Utah Science Technology and Research Project" means the buildings and activities described in Part 2, Utah Science Technology and Research Project.

